Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 5 Regional Jail Authorities

42-4-90.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Regional Jail Authorities Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-90

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 292, § 1.

42-4-91.
Statement of authority; policy of state.

This article is enacted pursuant to authority granted to the General Assembly by the Constitution of Georgia. Each authority created by this article is created for nonprofit and public purposes; and it is found, determined, and declared that the creation of each such authority and the carrying out of its corporate purposes is in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state and that the authority is an institution of purely public charity and will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the power conferred upon it by this article. For such reasons, the state covenants from time to time with the holders of the bonds issued under this article that such authority shall be required to pay no taxes or assessments imposed by the state or any of its counties, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, or taxing districts upon any property acquired by the authority or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision or leased by it to others; or upon its activities in the operation or maintenance of any such property; or upon any rentals, charges, purchase price, installments, or otherwise; and that the bonds of such authority, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall at all times be exempt from taxation within the state. The tax exemption provided in this Code section shall include exemption from sales and use tax on property purchased by the authority or for use by the authority.

It is the express policy of the State of Georgia that any authority created by this article shall be authorized to enter into agreements with any county or municipality within the same county as the regional jail authority for the purpose of building, owning, and operating a jail facility for the county or municipality.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-91

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1098, § 1.

42-4-92.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Authority” means each public body corporate and politic created pursuant to this article.

“Cost of project” means all costs of site preparation and other start-up costs; all costs of construction; all costs of real and personal property required for the purposes of the jail facilities related thereto, including land and any rights or undivided interest therein, easements, franchises, fees, permits, approvals, licenses, and certificates and the securing of such permits, approvals, licenses, and certificates and all machinery and equipment, including motor vehicles which are used for jail functions; financing charges and interest prior to and during construction and during such additional period as the authority may reasonably determine to be necessary for the placing of the jail in operation; costs of engineering, architectural, and legal services; cost of plans and specifications and all expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the jail; administrative expenses; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the financing authorized in this article. The costs of any jail may also include funds for the creation of a debt service reserve, a renewal and replacement reserve, and such other reserves as may be reasonably required by the authority for the operation of any jail and as may be authorized by any bond resolution or trust agreement or indenture pursuant to the provisions of which the issuance of any such bonds may be authorized. Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the foregoing purposes shall be regarded as a part of the costs of the jail and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of user fees, or revenue bonds or notes issued under this article for such jail, or from other revenues obtained by the authority.

“County” means any county of this state or governmental entity formed by the consolidation of a county and one or more municipal corporations.

“County regional jail authority” means a regional jail authority formed by counties pursuant to this article.

“Governing body” means the elected or duly appointed officials constituting the governing body of each county in the state.

“Management committee” means a regional jail authority management committee created pursuant to Code Section 42-4-95.

“Municipal regional jail authority” means a regional jail authority formed by municipalities within the same county pursuant to this article.

“Municipality” means any municipal corporation of this state.

“Project” means a jail and all other structures including electric, gas, water, and other utilities and facilities, equipment, personal property, and vehicles which are deemed by the authority as necessary and convenient for the operation of the jail.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-92

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1098, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 42.

42-4-93.
Creation of authorities; ordinance or resolution required; agreement; approval of sheriff; exemption from Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission Act.

Any two or more counties may jointly form an authority, to be known as the county regional jail authority for such counties. Any two or more municipalities within the same county may jointly form an authority, to be known as the municipal regional jail authority for such municipalities. Municipalities located in more than one county may participate in municipal regional jail authorities in each county in which the municipality is located. No authority shall transact any business or exercise any powers under this article until the governing authorities of the counties or municipalities involved declare, by ordinance or resolution, that there is a need for an authority to function and until the governing authorities authorize the chief elected official of each county or municipality to enter into an agreement with the other counties or municipalities participating in the authority for the activation of an authority and such agreement is executed. Such authorities shall be public bodies, corporate and politic, and instrumentalities of the State of Georgia. A copy of the ordinance or resolution and agreement among participant counties or participant municipalities shall be filed with the Secretary of State who shall maintain a record of all authority activities under this article.

No county may be included in an authority without approval of the sheriff of the participant county.

Article 2 of Chapter 17 of Title 50, the “Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission Act,” shall not apply to any authority created under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-93

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1098, § 3.

42-4-94.
Board of directors; members; election of officers; expenses; duties; addition of counties or municipalities to authority.

Control and management of the authority shall be vested in a board of directors. Each county participating in an authority shall appoint the sheriff of the county for the term of such sheriff’s office. One other member from each participating county shall be appointed for a four-year term. Each municipality participating in an authority shall appoint two people to serve on the board of directors, each for a four-year term. For each county or municipal regional jail authority board of directors, an additional member shall be appointed by the directors themselves. The directors shall elect one of their members as chairperson and another as vice chairperson and shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer or a secretary-treasurer, either of whom may, but need not be, a director. The directors shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The directors may make bylaws and regulations for the governing of the authority and may delegate to one or more of the officers, agents, and employees of the authority such powers and duties as may be deemed necessary and proper.

It is the duty of the board of directors to erect or repair, when necessary, the jail and to furnish the jail with all the furniture necessary for the different rooms, offices, and cells. The jail shall be erected and kept in order and repaired at the expense of the authority under the direction of the board of directors which is authorized to make all necessary contracts for that purpose. The board of directors shall pass an annual budget sufficient for the efficient and effective operation of the jail.

Members of the board of directors of an authority formed pursuant to this Code section may agree that additional counties, if a county regional jail authority, or additional municipalities, if a municipal regional jail authority, may become members of such authority subsequent to its formation upon an affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of such board of directors under such terms as may be imposed by such two-thirds of the members of such board of directors.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-94

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1098, § 4.

42-4-95.
Management committee of county regional jail authority; management and operation of municipal regional jail authority.

The jail of a county regional jail authority shall be managed and operated by a regional jail authority management committee composed of all of the sheriffs from the participant counties. The county regional jail authority management committee shall have all of the responsibilities provided in Code Section 15-16-24 and this chapter, including the employment and supervision of all personnel employed to operate the jail. The sheriffs shall elect one of their members as chairperson and another as vice chairperson and shall also elect a secretary who may or may not be a member of the committee. The committee shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The committee may delegate to one or more of the officers, agents, and employees of the committee such powers and duties as may be deemed necessary and proper.

In the event that the county regional jail authority consists of an even number of counties, the sheriffs shall then elect one member, who may or may not be a member of the authority’s board of directors, to serve on the management committee.

The board of directors of a municipal regional jail authority shall hire or contract with a person, firm, corporation, or local government to manage and operate the regional jail. Such person, firm, corporation, or local government shall have all of the responsibilities provided in this chapter for municipal jails and jailers, including the employment and supervision of all personnel employed to operate the jail.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-95

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1098, § 5.

42-4-96.
Quorums; voting requirements.

A majority of the board of directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business of the authority. However, any action with respect to any project of the authority must be approved by the affirmative vote of not less than a majority of the directors.

A majority of the regional jail authority management committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business of the management committee.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-96

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 292, § 1.

42-4-97.
Powers of authority.

Each authority shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this article, including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the power:

To bring and defend actions except to the extent the authority has governmental immunity, venue being located in the host county of any project of the authority. The authority shall have no governmental immunity against suits by bondholders or their investors;

To adopt and amend the corporate seal;

To acquire, construct, improve, or modify, to place into operation, or to operate or cause to be placed in operation and operated, a jail or jails within the counties in which the authority is activated and subject to execution of agreements with appropriate political subdivisions affected within other counties or municipalities and to pay all or part of the cost of any such jail or jails from the proceeds of revenue bonds of the authority or from any contribution or loan by persons, firms, or corporations or from any other contribution or use fees, all of which the authority is authorized to receive, accept, and use;

To acquire, in its own name, by purchase on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper, or by condemnation in accordance with any and all laws applicable to the condemnation of property for public use, or by gift, grant, lease, or otherwise, real property or rights and easements therein and franchises and personal property necessary or convenient for its corporate purposes, which purposes shall include, but shall not be limited to, the constructing or acquiring of a jail or jails; the improving, extending, adding to, reconstructing, renovating, or remodeling of any jail or jails or parts thereof already constructed or acquired; or the demolition to make room for such jail or any part thereof and to insure the same against any and all risks as such insurance may, from time to time, be available. The authority may also use such property and rent or lease the same to or from others or make contracts with respect to the use thereof or sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge, or otherwise dispose of or grant options for any such property in any manner which the authority deems to the best advantage of itself and its purposes, provided that the powers to acquire, use, and dispose of property as set forth in this paragraph shall include the power to acquire, use, and dispose of any interest in such property, whether divided or undivided, which acquisition may result in the ownership of such property or any part thereof in common with any other party or parties, public or private;

To make contracts and leases and to execute all instruments necessary or convenient, including contracts for construction of jails and leases of jails or contracts with respect to the use of jails which it causes to be acquired or constructed on a negotiated basis without competitive bid, provided that all private persons, firms, and corporations, this state, and all political subdivisions, departments, instrumentalities, or agencies of the state or of local government are authorized to enter into contracts, leases, or agreements with the authority, upon such terms and for such purposes as they deem advisable; and, without limiting the generality of the provisions of this paragraph, authority is specifically granted to municipal corporations and counties and to the authority to enter into contracts, lease agreements, or other undertakings relative to the furnishing of project activities and facilities or either of them by the authority to such municipal corporations and counties and by such municipal corporations and counties to the authority for a term not exceeding 50 years;

To exercise any one or more of the powers, rights, and privileges conferred by this Code section either alone or jointly or in common with one or more other public or private parties. In any such exercise of such powers, rights, and privileges jointly or in common with others with respect to the construction, operation, and maintenance of jail facilities, the authority may own an undivided interest in such facilities with any other party with which it may jointly or in common exercise the rights and privileges conferred by this article and may enter into an agreement or agreements with respect to any such jail facility with the other party or parties participating therein; and such agreement may contain such terms, conditions, and provisions, consistent with this article, as the parties thereto shall deem to be in their best interests, including, but not limited to, provisions for the construction, operation, and maintenance of such jail facility by any one or more of the parties to such agreement, which party or parties shall be designated in or pursuant to such agreement as agent or agents on behalf of itself and one or more of the other parties thereto, or by such other means as may be determined by the parties thereto, and including provisions for a method or methods of determining and allocating, among or between the parties, costs of construction, operation, maintenance, renewals, replacements, improvements, and disposal with respect to such facility, such agent shall be governed by the laws and regulations applicable to such agent as a separate legal entity and not by any laws or regulations which may be applicable to any of the other participating parties; provided, however, the agent shall act for the benefit of the public. Notwithstanding anything contained in any other law to the contrary, pursuant to the terms of any such agreement, the authority may delegate its powers and duties with respect to the construction, operation, and maintenance of such facility to the party acting as agent; and all actions taken by such agent in accordance with the provisions of such agreement may be binding upon the authority without further action or approval of the authority;

To accept, receive, and administer gifts, grants, appropriations, and donations of money, materials, and property of any kind, including loans and grants from the United States, this state, a unit of local government, or any agency, department, authority, or instrumentality of any of the foregoing, upon such terms and conditions as the United States, this state, a unit of local government, or such agency, department, authority, or instrumentality shall impose; to administer trusts; and to sell, lease, transfer, convey, appropriate, and pledge any and all of its property and assets;

To do any and all things necessary or proper for the accomplishment of the objectives of this article and to exercise any power usually possessed by private corporations performing similar functions which is not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of this state, including the power to employ professional and administrative staff and personnel by and through the management committee and to retain legal, engineering, fiscal, accounting, and other professional services; the power to purchase all kinds of insurance, including, without limitation, insurance against tort liability and against risks of damage to property; the power to borrow money for any of the corporate purposes of the authority; the power to indemnify and hold harmless any parties contracting with the authority or its agents from damage to persons or property; and the power to act as self-insurer with respect to any loss or liability; provided, however, that obligations of the authority other than revenue bonds, for which provision is made in this article, shall be payable from the general funds of the authority and shall not be a charge against any special fund allocated to the payment of revenue bonds;

To borrow money and issue its revenue bonds and bond anticipation notes from time to time and to use the proceeds thereof for the purpose of paying all or part of the cost of any jail, including the cost of extending, adding to, or improving such jail, or for the purpose of refunding any such bonds of the authority theretofore issued; and otherwise to carry out the purposes of this article and to pay all other costs of the authority incident to, or necessary and appropriate to, such purposes, including the provision of funds to be paid into any fund or funds to secure such bonds and notes, provided that all such bonds and notes shall be issued in accordance with the procedures and subject to the limitations set forth in Code Section 42-4-100; and

To fix rentals and other charges which any user shall pay to the authority for the use of a jail or part or combination thereof, and to charge and collect the same, and to lease and make contracts with political subdivisions and agencies with respect to the use of any part of any jail or jails. Such rentals and other charges shall be so fixed and adjusted with respect to the aggregate thereof from the jail or any part thereof so as to provide a fund with other revenues of such jail, if any, to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating the jail, including reserves for extraordinary repairs and insurance, unless such cost shall be otherwise provided for, which costs shall be deemed to include the expenses incurred by the authority on account of the jail for water, light, sewer, and other services furnished by other facilities at such jail.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-97

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1098, § 6; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 42.

42-4-98.
Duties and responsibilities of sheriffs and governing bodies imposed upon management committee and authority.

Every duty and responsibility of the sheriff of a participant county to operate a jail in an efficient and orderly manner is imposed upon the management committee and to that extent the sheriff of a participant county is relieved of those duties with respect to the operation of a jail including specifically, but without limitation, Code Section 15-16-24 and this chapter.

Every duty and responsibility of the governing body of a participant county to erect, repair, and furnish a jail in an efficient and orderly manner is imposed on the authority as provided in the agreement between the participating government and the authority and to that extent the county is relieved, including specifically but without limitation, of those duties imposed by Code Sections 36-9-5 through 36-9-11, with respect to jails. The authority shall adopt a budget for the operation of the jail that reasonably and adequately provides for the personnel, training of personnel, equipment, facilities, and other items necessary for the management committee to operate the jail. The authority shall hold budget hearings not less than 120 days prior to the adoption of the budget.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-98

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 42.

42-4-99.
Limitation on liability of members, officers, or employees.

Except for willful or wanton misconduct, neither the members of the authority nor any officer or employee of the authority, acting on behalf thereof and while acting within the scope of his or her responsibilities, shall be subject to any liability resulting from:

The design, construction, ownership, maintenance, operation, or management of a jail or jails; or

The carrying out of any of the discretionary powers or duties expressly provided for in this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-99

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 292, § 1.

42-4-100.
Bonds or other obligations; requirements and procedure for issuance.

Subject to the limitations and procedures provided by this Code section, the obligations of any authority evidenced by bonds, bond anticipation notes, trust indentures, deeds to secure obligations, security agreements, or mortgages executed in connection therewith may contain such provisions not inconsistent with law as shall be determined by the board of directors of the authority. The authority, in such instruments, may provide for the pledging of all or any part of its revenues, income, or charges and for the mortgaging, encumbering, or conveying of all or any part of its real or personal property; may covenant against pledging any or all of its revenues, income, or charges; and may further provide for the disposition of proceeds realized from the sale of any bonds and bond anticipation notes, for the replacement of lost, destroyed, stolen, or mutilated bonds and notes, and for the payment and redemption of such bonds and notes. Similarly, subject to the limitations and procedures of this Code section, undertakings of any authority may prescribe the procedure by which bondholders and noteholders may enforce rights against the authority and provide for rights upon breach of any covenant, condition, or obligation of the authority. Bonds, resolutions, trust indentures, mortgages, or deeds to secure obligations executed by an authority and bond anticipation notes executed by an authority may contain such provisions not otherwise contrary to law as the authority shall deem necessary or desirable.

The proceeds derived from the sale of all bonds and bond anticipation notes issued by an authority shall be held and used for the ultimate purpose of paying, directly or indirectly as permitted in this article, all or part of the cost of any jail, including the cost of extending, financing, adding to, or improving such jail, or for the purpose of refunding any bond anticipation notes issued in accordance with this article or refunding any previously issued bonds of the authority.

All bonds and bond anticipation notes issued by an authority shall be revenue obligations of such authority and may be made payable out of any revenues or other receipts, funds, or moneys of the authority, subject only to any agreements with the holders of other bonds or bond anticipation notes or to particular security agreements pledging any particular revenues, receipts, funds, or moneys.

Issuance by an authority of one or more series of bonds or bond anticipation notes for one or more purposes shall not preclude it from issuing other bonds or notes in connection with the same jail or with any other jails, but the proceeding wherein any subsequent bonds or bond anticipation notes shall be issued shall recognize and protect any prior pledge or mortgage made in any prior security agreement or made for any prior issue of bonds or bond anticipation notes, unless in the resolution authorizing such prior issue the right is expressly reserved to the authority to issue subsequent bonds or bond anticipation notes on a parity with such prior issue.

An authority shall have the power and is authorized, whenever revenue bonds of the authority have been validated as provided in this article, to issue, from time to time, its notes in anticipation of the issuance of such bonds as validated and to renew from time to time any such notes by the issuance of new notes, whether the notes to be renewed have or have not matured. The authority may issue notes only to provide funds which would otherwise be provided by the issuance of the bonds as validated. The notes may be authorized, sold, executed, and delivered in the same manner as bonds. As with its bonds, the authority may sell such notes at public or private sale. Any resolution or resolutions authorizing notes of the authority or any issue thereof may contain any provision which the authority is authorized to include in any such resolution or resolutions; and the authority may include in any notes any terms, covenants, or conditions which it is authorized to include in any bonds. Validation of such bonds shall be a condition precedent to the issuance of the notes, but it shall not be required that such notes be judicially validated. Bond anticipation notes shall not be issued in an amount exceeding the par value of the bonds in anticipation of which they are to be issued.

The interest rate on or rates to be borne by any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by the authority shall be fixed by the board of directors of the authority. Any limitation with respect to interest rates found in Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36 or in the usury laws of this state shall not apply to obligations issued under this article.

All revenue bonds issued by an authority under this article will be issued and validated under and in accordance with Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36, except as provided in subsection (f) of this Code section and except as specifically set forth below:

Revenue bonds issued by an authority shall be fully registered and shall be subject to such exchangeability and transferability provisions as the bond resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or any indenture or trust agreement may provide;

Revenue bonds shall bear a certificate of validation. The signature of the clerk of the superior court of the judicial circuit in which the issuing authority is located may be made on the certificate of validation of such bonds by facsimile or by manual execution, stating the date on which such bonds were validated; and such entry shall be original evidence of the fact of judgment and shall be received as original evidence in any court in this state; and

In lieu of specifying the rate or rates of interest which revenue bonds to be issued by an authority are to bear, the notice to the district attorney or the Attorney General and the notice to the public of the time, place, and date of the validation hearing may state that the bonds, when issued, will bear interest at a rate not exceeding a maximum per annum rate of interest specified in such notes or, in the event the bonds are to bear different rates of interest for different maturity dates, that none of such bonds shall bear interest at such rate or rates without regard to any limitation contained in any other statute or law of this state; provided, however, that nothing contained in this paragraph shall be construed as prohibiting or restricting the right of the authority to sell such bonds at a discount, even if in so doing the effective interest cost resulting therefrom would exceed the maximum per annum interest rate specified in such notices.

The term “cost of project” shall have the meaning prescribed in paragraph (2) of Code Section 42-4-92 whenever referred to in bond resolutions of an authority, bonds, and bond anticipation notes issued by an authority, or notices and proceedings to validate such bonds.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-100

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 292, § 1.

42-4-101.
Bonds or other obligations not indebtedness of state or political subdivision; payment.

No bonds or other obligations of and no indebtedness incurred by any authority shall constitute an indebtedness or obligation of the State of Georgia or of any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision thereof, nor shall any act of any authority in any manner constitute or result in the creation of an indebtedness of this state or of any such county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision. However, provisions of this Code section shall not preclude counties, municipal corporations, or other political subdivisions from choosing to guarantee the bonds, indebtedness, or other obligations of a jail authority as part of its demonstration of adequate financial responsibility pursuant to this article. All such bonds and obligations shall be payable solely from the revenues therein pledged to such payment, including pledged rentals, sales proceeds, insurance proceeds, and condemnation awards; and no holder or holders of any such bond or obligation shall ever have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of this state or of any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision thereof or to enforce the payment thereof against any property of the state or of any such county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-101

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 292, § 1.

42-4-102.
Construction of article; bonds not subject to regulation under Georgia Uniform Securities Act; power of counties and municipalities to activate authorities.

This article shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof. Sale or issuance of bonds by any authority shall not be subject to regulation under Chapter 5 of Title 10, the “Georgia Uniform Securities Act of 2008,” or any other law.

A county or any number of counties or a municipality or any number of municipalities shall have the right to activate any authority under this article, notwithstanding the existence of any other authority having similar powers or purposes within the county or a municipal corporation created pursuant to any general law or amendment to the Constitution of this state. However, nothing in this article shall be construed as repealing, amending, superseding, or altering the organization of or abridging the powers of such authorities as are now in existence.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-102

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1098, § 7; Ga. L. 2008, p. 381, § 10/SB 358.

42-4-103.
Operation and finance agreement required; withdrawal from authority.

Failure of a participant county or participant municipality to execute an operation and finance agreement duly adopted by the authority at a regularly scheduled meeting or a meeting called for that purpose within 60 days after such agreement has been executed by two or more participant counties or participant municipalities shall constitute a withdrawal from the authority.

Any participant county or participant municipality may withdraw from the authority subject to any contract, obligation, or agreement with the authority, but no participant county or participant municipality shall be permitted to withdraw from any authority after any obligation has been incurred by the authority. The governing body of the participant county or participant municipality wishing to withdraw from an existing authority shall signify its desire by resolution or ordinance.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-103

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1098, § 8.

42-4-104.
Authority of county or municipality to establish and maintain jail or jail-holding facility.

Notwithstanding anything contained in this article, no participant county or participant municipality shall be prohibited from establishing and maintaining any jail or jail-holding facility. Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, such jails shall be operated as provided in the laws of this state as if the county or municipality was not a participant in the regional jail authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-104

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1098, § 9.

42-4-105.
Immunity of authorities from liability.

Regional jail authorities shall be carrying out an essential governmental function on behalf of participant counties or participant municipalities and are, therefore, given immunity from liability for carrying out their intended functions.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-4-105

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1098, § 10.